Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:Agricultural buildings used for agritourism activities, as defined in RCW 4.24.830, are not subject to building code standards that apply to a commercial building permit, except standards to meet all life and fire safety requirements, if the building is only used for agritourism activities six months or less every year.--- END ---